Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201618-2703
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act, the definitions found in sections 18-2703.01 to 18-2709.01 shall be used.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 827, § 11;

Laws 2016, LB1059, § 3.
July 21, 2016